src/verb-fao-morph.txt
LEXICON s65 ! standa
:and                inf ;
:and                pres-strong-s1 ;
:end                pres-strong-s23 ;
:óð                 prt-null-s ;  
:óð     	    prt-u-p ; 
:að                 sup-null ;
:att                imp ;
:and                prsptc ;

LEXICON s66 ! biðja
                    jinf ;
                    pres-ur-j ;
:%^AB3              prt-null-s ;
:%^AB2              prt-u-p ;
                    sup-null ;
+V+PrfPrc:%>in      l26 ;

LEXICON s67 ! draga
:ag                    inf ;
:ag                    pres-strong-s1 ;
:eg                    pres-strong-s23 ;
:ó                     prt-null-s ; !dróg, should be dró
:óg                    prt-u-p ;
:ag                    sup-null ;  ! %^AB2
:ag                    imp-prsptc ;
+V+PrfPrc:%AB2%>in  l26 ;

LEXICON s68 ! hvørva
:vørv               inf ;
:vørv               pres-ur ;
:varv               prt-null-s ;
:vurv               prt-u-p ;
:orv                sup-null ;
:vorv               sup-null ;
:vørv               imp-prsptc ;
+V+PrfPrc:vorv%>in  l26 ;

LEXICON s69 ! sláa
                    inf ;
                    pres-strong-s1 ;
:%^IUML             pres-strong-s23-t1 ; 
:%^AB2              prt-null-s ;
!:slerdi  prt-null-s ;
!:slóg    prt-u-p ;
!:slerd   prt-u-p ;
!:sligi   sup-a ;
!:sligin  l26 ;

LEXICON s70 ! siga
:sig        inf ;
:sig        pres-ur ;
:segði      prt-null-s ;
:søgð       prt-u-p ;
:søgd	    prt-u-p ; !XXX SUB?
:sig        imp-prsptc ;
:sag        sup ;
+V+PrfPrc:sagd%>     l8 ;

LEXICON s71 ! skerja
:sker   jinf ;
:sker   pres-ir ;
:sker   prt-d ;
:skert  sup-a ;
:sker   imp-prsptc ;
+V+PrfPrc:skerd  l7 ;

LEXICON s72 ! eta
:et       inf ;
:et       pres-ur ;
:át       prt-null-s ;
:ót       prt-u-p ;
:et       sup-null ;
:et       imp-prsptc ;
+V+PrfPrc:et%>in   l26 ;

LEXICON s73 ! læa
:læ    inf ;
:lær   pres-ur ;
:læ    prt-d ;
:ló    prt-null-s ;
:læð   sup-a ;
:læið  sup-a ;
:læ    imp-prsptc ;
+V+PrfPrc:læin  l26 ; !?

LEXICON s74 ! grindast
reflinf ;
pres-ast ;


LEXICON s75 ! balast
reflinf ;


LEXICON s76 ! ræðast
reflinf ;


LEXICON s77 ! minnast
reflinf ;


LEXICON s78 ! farast
reflinf ;


LEXICON s79 ! skjótast
reflinf ;


LEXICON s80 ! trivast
reflinf ;


LEXICON s81 ! kíkjast
reflinf ;


LEXICON s82 ! f´ylast
reflinf ;



! Split lexica
! ============

! The lexicon names are, as always, from FO.
! Now, these are just mechanically split.
! They should be split more precisely,
! just like s2/1, in order to keep
! things minimal.

LEXICON s1/26
s1 ;
s26 ;

LEXICON s1/30
s1 ;
s30 ;

LEXICON s11/15
s11 ;
s15 ;

LEXICON s15/11
s15 ;
s11 ;

LEXICON s18/16
s18 ;
s16 ;

LEXICON s19/30
s19 ;
s30 ;

LEXICON s2/1
s2 ;
prt-d ; ! this is the s1 part

LEXICON s2/30
s2 ;
s30 ;

LEXICON s21/11
s21 ;
s11 ;

LEXICON s21/18
s21 ;
s18 ;

LEXICON s24/2
s24 ;
s2 ;

LEXICON s25/1
s25 ;
s1 ;

LEXICON s27/30
s27 ;
s30 ;

LEXICON s28/30
s28 ;
s30 ;

LEXICON s29/2
s29 ;
s2 ;

LEXICON s29/30
s29 ;
s30 ;

LEXICON s3/30
s3 ;
s30 ;

LEXICON s30/1
s30 ;
s1 ;

LEXICON s30/11
s30 ;
s11 ;

LEXICON s30/19
s30 ;
s19 ;

LEXICON s30/2
s30 ;
s2 ;

LEXICON s30/22
s30 ;
s22 ;

LEXICON s30/27
s30 ;
s27 ;

LEXICON s30/28
s30 ;
s28 ;

LEXICON s30/29
s30 ;
s29 ;

LEXICON s30/40
s30 ;
s40 ;

LEXICON s30/5
s30 ;
s5 ;

LEXICON s30/6
s30 ;
s6 ;

LEXICON s30/9
s30 ;
s9 ;

LEXICON s36/2
s36 ;
s2 ;

!LEXICON s39/30
!s30 ;
!s39 ;

LEXICON s47/19
s47 ;
s19 ;

LEXICON s49/52
s49 ;
s52 ;

LEXICON s49/9
s49 ;
s9 ;

LEXICON s5/30
s5 ;
s30 ;

LEXICON s52/30
s52 ;
s30 ;

LEXICON s6/30
s6 ;
s30 ;

LEXICON s60/30
s60 ;
s30 ;

LEXICON s7/49
s7 ;
s49 ;

LEXICON s74/75
s74 ;
s75 ;

LEXICON s77/74
s77 ;
s74 ;

LEXICON s8/30
s8 ;
s30 ;

LEXICON s9/30
s9 ;
s30 ;





! Intermediate lexicon groups
! ===========================

LEXICON standard-ir
 inf ;
 prt-d ;
 ir-verb ;

LEXICON standard-ir-t
 inf ;
 prt-t ; !XXX skilti
 ir-verb ;

LEXICON standard-j-ir-t
  prt-t ; !XXX skilti
  standard-j-ir-nopret ;

! possibly also (no, handled by s1/2
!LEXICON standard-j-ir-td
!   prt-t ;
!   prt-d ;
!   standard-j-ir-nopret ;


LEXICON standard-j-ir ! the prt-d
   standard-j-ir-nopret ;
   prt-d ; 

LEXICON standard-j-ir-nopret
   jinf ;
   pres-ir-sg ;
:j pres-pl ;
   imp-prsptc ;
   sup ;

LEXICON ir-verb
pres-ir ;
imp-prsptc ;
sup ;


! Suffix lexica
! =============

! Infinitive

LEXICON jinf
+V+Inf:%>ja PASS ;
+V+Inf+Pass:%>jast #;

LEXICON inf
+V+Inf:%>a PASS ;
+V+Inf+Pass:%>ast # ;

LEXICON reflinf
+V+Inf+Pass:%>ast # ;

! Present

LEXICON pres-ir
pres-ir-sg ;
pres-pl ;

LEXICON pres-ir-sg
+V+Ind+Prs+1Sg:%>i  PASS ;
+V+Ind+Prs+2Sg:%>ir PASS ;
+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg:%>ir PASS ;

LEXICON pres-ar
+V+Ind+Prs+1Sg:%>a PASS ;
+V+Ind+Prs+2Sg:%>ar PASS ;
+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg:%>ar PASS ;
pres-pl ;

LEXICON pres-ur
+V+Ind+Prs+1Sg:%>i PASS ;
+V+Ind+Prs+2Sg:%>ur PASS ;
+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg:%>ur PASS ;
pres-pl ;

LEXICON pres-ur-j
+V+Ind+Prs+1Sg:%>ji PASS ;
+V+Ind+Prs+2Sg:%>ur PASS ;
+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg:%>ur PASS ;
pres-pl ;

LEXICON pres-null
+V+Ind+Prs+1Sg:%> PASS ;
+V+Ind+Prs+2Sg:%> PASS ;
+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg:%> PASS ;
pres-pl ;

LEXICON pres-strong-s1
+V+Ind+Prs+1Sg:%>i  PASS ;
pres-pl ;         !XXX

LEXICON pres-strong-s23
+V+Ind+Prs+2Sg:%>ur PASS ;
+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg:%>ur PASS ;
!pres-pl ;

LEXICON pres-strong-s23-t0
+V+Ind+Prs+2Sg:%>t PASS ;
+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg:%> PASS ;
!pres-pl ;

LEXICON pres-strong-s23-t1
+V+Ind+Prs+2Sg:%>rt PASS ;
+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg:%>r PASS ;
!pres-pl ;

LEXICON pres-pl
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl:%>a PASS ;

LEXICON pres-ast
+V+Ind+Prs+1Sg:%> # ;
+V+Ind+Prs+2Sg:%>ast # ;
+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg:%>ast # ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl:%>ast # ;



! Preterite

LEXICON prt-d
 prt-di ;
 prt-du ;
 
LEXICON prt-t
 prt-ti ;
 prt-tu ;
 
LEXICON prt-di 
+V+Ind+Prt+Sg:%>di PASS ;

LEXICON prt-ði 
+V+Ind+Prt+Sg:%>ði PASS ;

LEXICON prt-ti 
+V+Ind+Prt+Sg:%>di PASS ;

LEXICON prt-du
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl:%>du PASS ;

LEXICON prt-tu
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl:%>tu PASS ;

!LEXICON prt-ðu
!+V+Ind+Prt+Pl:%>ðu PASS ;

LEXICON prt-dd
+V+Ind+Prt+Sg:%>ddi PASS ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl:%>ddu PASS ;

LEXICON prt-a
+V+Ind+Prt+Sg:%>aði PASS ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl:%>aðu PASS ;

LEXICON prt-null-s
+V+Ind+Prt+1Sg: PASS ;
+V+Ind+Prt+2Sg:%>st PASS ;
+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: PASS ;

LEXICON prt-null-s2
+V+Ind+Prt+1Sg: PASS ;
+V+Ind+Prt+2Sg:%>t PASS ;
+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: PASS ;

LEXICON prt-u-p
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl:%>u PASS ;



! Imperative and present participle

LEXICON imp-prsptc
imp ;
prsptc ;

LEXICON imp
impsg ;
imppl ;

LEXICON impsg
+V+Imp+Sg: PASS ;

LEXICON imppl
+V+Imp+Pl:%^JI%>ið PASS ;

LEXICON prsptc
+V+PrsPrc:%>andi VANDI ;
+A:%>andi HOMONYM-ADJ-FORMS ;

! Supine and preterite participle
 
LEXICON sup
+V+Sup:%>t PASS ;
+V+PrfPrc:%>d%>ur PASS ;

LEXICON sup-tt
+V+Sup:%>tt PASS ;
+V+PrfPrc:%>dd%>ur PASS ;

LEXICON sup-a ! kalla
+V+Sup:%>að PASS ;
+V+PrfPrc:%>að%>ur PASS ; 

LEXICON sup-null ! stungið
+V+Sup:%>ið PASS ;

! Ad hoc, irregular
! =================

LEXICON BLÍVA
+Inf:blíva PASS ;
+Ind+Prs+1Sg:blívi PASS ;
+Ind+Prs+2Sg:blív%>ur PASS ;
+Ind+Prs+3Sg:blív%>ur PASS ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl:blíva PASS ;
+Ind+Prt+1Sg:bleiv PASS ;
+Ind+Prt+2Sg:bleivst PASS ;
+Ind+Prt+3Sg:bleiv PASS ;
+Ind+Prt+Pl:blivu PASS ;
+Imp+Sg:blív PASS ;
+Imp+Pl:blívið PASS ;
+PrsPrc:blívandi VANDI ;
+PrfPrc:blívin PASS ;
+Sup:blívið PASS ;

LEXICON EIGA
+Inf:eiga PASS ;
+Ind+Prs+1Sg:eigi PASS ;
+Ind+Prs+2Sg:eig%>ur PASS ;
+Ind+Prs+2Sg:eig%>ur PASS ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl:eiga PASS ;
+Ind+Prt+Sg:átti PASS ;
+Ind+Prt+Pl:áttu PASS ;
+PrsPrc:eigandi VANDI ;
+PrfPrc:eigin PASS ;
+Sup:eigið  PASS ;

LEXICON HAVA
+Inf:hava PASS ;
+Ind+Prs+1Sg:havi PASS ;
+Ind+Prs+2Sg:hev%>ur PASS ;
+Ind+Prs+3Sg:hev%>ur PASS ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl:hava PASS ;
+Ind+Prt+Sg:hevði PASS ;
+Ind+Prt+Pl:høvdu PASS ;
+Imp+Sg:hav PASS ;
+Imp+Pl:havið PASS ;
+PrsPrc:havandi VANDI ;
+PrfPrc:havd%>ur PASS ;
+Sup:havt PASS ;

LEXICON KUNNA
+Inf:kunna # ;
+Ind+Prs+1Sg:kann # ;
+Ind+Prs+2Sg:kanst # ;
+Ind+Prs+3Sg:kann # ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl:kunnu # ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl:kunna # ;
+Ind+Prt+Sg:kundi # ;
+Ind+Prt+Pl:kundu # ;
+Sup:kunnað # ;

LEXICON MEGA
+Inf:mega # ;
+Ind+Prs+1Sg:má # ;
+Ind+Prs+2Sg:mást # ;
+Ind+Prs+3Sg:má # ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl:mugu # ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl:muga # ;
+Ind+Prt+Sg:mátti # ;
+Ind+Prt+Pl:máttu # ;

LEXICON MUNNA
+Inf:munna # ;
+Ind+Prs+1Sg:man # ;
+Ind+Prs+2Sg:manst # ;
+Ind+Prs+3Sg:man # ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl:munnu # ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl:munna # ;
+Ind+Prt+Sg:mundi # ;
+Ind+Prt+Pl:mundu # ;
+Sup:munnað # ;

LEXICON SKULA
+Inf:skula # ;
+Ind+Prs+1Sg:skal # ;
+Ind+Prs+2Sg:skalt # ;
+Ind+Prs+3Sg:skal # ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl:skulu # ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl:skula # ;
+Ind+Prt+Sg:skuldi # ;
+Ind+Prt+Pl:skuldu # ;
+Sup:skulað # ;

LEXICON VERA
+Inf:vera # ;
+Ind+Prs+1Sg:eri # ;
+Ind+Prs+2Sg:ert # ;
+Ind+Prs+3Sg:er # ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl:eru # ;
+Ind+Prt+1Sg:var # ;
+Ind+Prt+2Sg:varst # ;
+Ind+Prt+3Sg:var # ;
+Ind+Prt+Pl:vóru # ;
+Sup:verið # ;

LEXICON VERÐA
+Inf:verða # ;
+Ind+Prs+1Sg:verði # ;
+Ind+Prs+2Sg:verð%>ur # ;
+Ind+Prs+3Sg:verð%>ur # ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl:verða # ;
+Ind+Prt+1Sg:varð # ;
+Ind+Prt+2Sg:varðst # ;
+Ind+Prt+3Sg:varð # ;
+Ind+Prt+Pl:vórðu # ;
+Imp+Sg:verð # ;
+Sbj+3Sg:verði # ; !XXX verði ljós
+Imp+Pl:verðið # ;
+PrsPrc:verðandi # ;
+PrfPrc:vorðin l26 ;


LEXICON VILJA
+Inf:vilja # ;
+Ind+Prs+1Sg:vil # ;
+Ind+Prs+2Sg:vilt # ;
+Ind+Prs+3Sg:vil # ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl:vilja # ;
+Ind+Prt+Sg:vildi # ;
+Ind+Prt+Pl:vildu # ;
+Sup:viljað # ;

LEXICON VITA
+Inf:vita PASS ;
+Ind+Prs+1Sg:veit PASS ;
+Ind+Prs+2Sg:veitst PASS ;
+Ind+Prs+3Sg:veit PASS ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl:vita PASS ;
+Ind+Prt+Sg:visti PASS ;
+Ind+Prt+Pl:vistu PASS ;
+Sup:vitað PASS ;


LEXICON SÍGGJA
+Inf:síggja PASS ;
+Ind+Prs+1Sg:síggi PASS ;
+Ind+Prs+2Sg:sært PASS ;
+Ind+Prs+3Sg:sær PASS ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl:síggja PASS ;
+Ind+Prt+1Sg:sá PASS ;
+Ind+Prt+2Sg:sást PASS ;
+Ind+Prt+3Sg:sá PASS ;
+Ind+Prt+Pl:sóu PASS ;
+Imp+Sg:síggj PASS ;
+Imp+Sg:sí PASS ;
+Imp+Pl:síggið PASS ;
+PrsPrc:síggjandi VANDI ;
+PrfPrc:sædd%>ur PASS ;
+Sup:sæð PASS ;
+Sup:sætt PASS ;

LEXICON FÁA
+Inf:fáa PASS ;
+Ind+Prs+1Sg:fái PASS ;
+Ind+Prs+2Sg:fært PASS ;
+Ind+Prs+3Sg:fær PASS ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl:fáa PASS ;
+Ind+Prt+1Sg:fekk PASS ;
+Ind+Prt+2Sg:fekst PASS ;
+Ind+Prt+3Sg:fekk PASS ;
+Ind+Prt+Pl:fingu PASS ;
+Imp+Sg:fá PASS ;
+Imp+Pl:fáið PASS ;
+PrfPrc:fingin PASS ;
+Sup:fingið PASS ;

LEXICON LIGGJA
+Inf:iggja PASS ;
+Ind+Prs+1Sg:iggi PASS ;
+Ind+Prs+2Sg:igg%>ur PASS ;
+Ind+Prs+3Sg:igg%>ur PASS ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl:iggja PASS ;
+Ind+Prt+1Sg:á PASS ;
+Ind+Prt+2Sg:ást PASS ;
+Ind+Prt+3Sg:á PASS ;
+Ind+Prt+Pl:ógu PASS ;
+Imp+Sg:igg PASS ;
+Imp+Pl:iggið PASS ;
+PrsPrc:iggjandi VANDI ;
+PrfPrc:igin PASS ; ! XXX fix link to adj
+Sup:igið PASS ;

LEXICON RADA
+Inf:ráða PASS ;
+Ind+Prs+1Sg:ræði PASS ;
+Ind+Prs+2Sg:ræður PASS ;
+Ind+Prs+3Sg:ræður PASS ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl:ráða PASS ;
+Ind+Prt+Sg:ráddi PASS ;
+Ind+Prt+Sg:ræð PASS ; ! old form
+Ind+Prt+Pl:ráddu PASS ;
+Imp+Sg:ráð PASS ;
+Imp+Pl:ráðið PASS ;
+PrsPrc:ráðandi VANDI ;
+PrfPrc:ráðin PASS ;
! The following two lines are commented out because they cause
! a segmentation fault in lexc!!!
!+Sup:rátt PASS ;
!+Sup:ráðið PASS ; ! old form

LEXICON DAMA
inf ;
pres-ar ;
prt-a ;
prt-d ;
prt-t ; ! rare
imp-prsptc ;
sup ;
+V+PrfPrc:%> l7 ;

!LEXICON 
!+Inf: PASS ;
!+Ind+Prs+1Sg: PASS ;
!+Ind+Prs+2Sg: PASS ;
!+Ind+Prs+3Sg: PASS ;
!+Ind+Prs+Pl: PASS ;
!+Ind+Prt+Sg: PASS ;
!+Ind+Prt+Pl: PASS ;
!+Imp+Sg: PASS ;
!+Imp+Pl: PASS ;
!+PrsPrc: PASS ;
!+PrfPrc: PASS ;
!+Sup: PASS ;



! Middle lexicon

LEXICON PASS
 # ; ! Verbs as usual
 +Pass:%^PASS%>st # ;

LEXICON VANDI
 # ; ! Verbs as usual
 andi ; ! participles
